Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4726
Commission; executive director; appoint.

The commission shall appoint a qualified person to serve as executive director who shall serve with the advice and consent of the commission. When appointing an executive director preference may be given to a deaf or hard of hearing person.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 250, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 17.